District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05h

Administrative appeals.

(a)

A person aggrieved by an action of the Mayor taken pursuant to this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part may appeal the action of the Mayor to the Office of Administrative Hearings, pursuant to § 2-1831.03(a). The Office of Administrative Hearings shall provide a de novo hearing and shall determine whether the Mayor’s action was legally proper.

(b)

An appeal shall be filed within 15 days after the adverse action of the Mayor or within 20 days if notice of the adverse action is served by United States mail or commercial carrier.

(c)

A person subject to an order issued pursuant to § 8-101.05g shall comply with the order pending appeal.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5h
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767